Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 36 SALES TAX
§ 63-3622HH. Production exemption shall not apply to sales regarding recreation-related vehicles. — (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the production exemption provided in section 63-3622D, Idaho Code, shall not apply to sales of or repairs to snowmobiles, off-highway motorbikes, recreational vehicles, or motorcycles and all sales of snowmobiles, off-highway motorbikes, recreational vehicles or motorcycles are subject to the sales and use taxes imposed by this chapter. All repairs to snowmobiles, off-highway motorbikes, recreational vehicles or motorcycles are subject to the sales and use taxes imposed by this chapter.

(2) As used in this section, the term “snowmobile” means any self-propelled vehicle under one thousand (1,000) pounds unladened gross weight designed primarily for travel on snow or ice or over natural terrain which may be steered by tracks, skis or runners, and which is not otherwise registered or licensed under the laws of the state of Idaho.

(3) As used in this section, the term “off-highway motorbike” means any self-propelled two (2), three (3), four (4) or five (5) wheeled motorcycle or motor-driven cycle, excluding tractor, designed for or capable of traveling off developed roadways and highways and also referred to as trailbikes, enduro bikes, trail bikes, motorcross bikes or dual purpose motorcycles.

(4) As used in this section, the term “recreational vehicle” means a motor home, travel trailer, park model recreational vehicle, truck camper or camping trailer, with or without motive power, designed for human habitation for recreational or emergency occupancy. The term “recreational vehicle” shall not include pickup hoods, shells, or canopies designed, created or modified for occupational usage. School buses or van type vehicles which are converted to recreational use are defined as recreational vehicles. Specific classes of recreational vehicles are defined as follows:

The term “motor home” shall mean a vehicular unit designed to provide temporary living quarters, built into an integral part of or permanently attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis. The vehicle must contain permanently installed independent life support systems which meet the American national standards institute (ANSI) A119.7 standard for recreational vehicles, and provide at least four (4) of the following facilities: cooking, refrigeration or icebox, self-contained toilet, heating and/or air conditioning, a potable water supply system including a faucet and sink, separate 110-125 volt electrical power supply and/or LP-gas supply.

The term “travel trailer” shall mean a vehicular unit, mounted on wheels, designed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, travel or emergency use and of such size or weight as not to require special highway movement permits when towed by a motorized vehicle.

The term “fifth-wheel trailer” shall mean a vehicular unit equipped in the same manner as a travel trailer but constructed with a raised forward section that allows a bi-level floor plan. This style is designed to be towed by a vehicle equipped with a device known as a fifth-wheel hitch, which is typically installed in the bed of a pickup truck.

The term “park model recreational vehicle” means a vehicle as defined in section 49-117, Idaho Code.

The term “fold down camping trailer” shall mean a vehicular portable unit mounted on wheels and constructed with collapsible partial side walls, which fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold at the campsite to provide temporary living quarters, for recreational, camping or travel use.
(f) The term “truck camper” shall mean a portable unit constructed to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, travel or camping use, consisting of a roof, floor, and sides, designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the bed of a pickup truck, and containing at least one (1) of the following facilities: stove; refrigerator or icebox; self-contained toilet; heater or air conditioner; potable water supply including a faucet and sink; separate 110-125 volt electrical power supply; or LP-gas supply.

(5) As used in this section, the term “motorcycle” means every motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground, but excluding a tractor. A motorcycle also is every motor scooter or motorized bicycle having an engine with less than one hundred fifty (150) cubic centimeters displacement or with five (5) brake horsepower or less.

(6) As used in this section, the term “repairs” shall include only the costs of parts, but not labor, utilized on the snowmobile, off-highway motorbike, recreational vehicle or motorcycle.

§ 63-3622II. Money-operated dispensing equipment. — There is hereby exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale or purchase of money-operated dispensing equipment which is solely consumed in dispensing a tangible product, amusement or service on which a retail sales tax is imposed or collected by the state of Idaho. As used in this section, “money-operated dispensing equipment” shall be interpreted narrowly to include only that equipment which consummates a sale by the placement of lawful money in the dispensing equipment and shall not include sales facilitating equipment such as, but not limited to, transportation, warehousing, storage, and display equipment which is consumed in the disposition of an item or product subject to the tax imposed by this chapter.

§ 63-3622JJ. Logging exemption. — There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter:

The sale at retail, storage, use or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property which is primarily and directly used or consumed in logging including, but not limited to, log loaders, log jammers, log skidders and fuel used in logging trucks, provided that the use or consumption of such tangible personal property is necessary or essential to logging.

The exemption allowed by subsection (1) of this section does not include machinery, equipment, materials and supplies used in a manner that is incidental to logging such as maintenance and janitorial equipment and supplies; nor does it include tangible personal property used in any activities other than the actual logging, such as office equipment and supplies, equipment and supplies used in selling or distributing activities or, except for fuel used in logging trucks, in transportation activities; nor shall this exemption include motor vehicles or aircraft, without regard to the use to which such motor vehicles or aircraft are put; nor shall this exemption apply to vehicles or equipment described in section 63-3622HH, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3622KK. Incidental sales by religious corporations or societies. — (1) Whenever any religious corporation or society as enumerated in section 63-602B, Idaho Code, purchases tangible personal property upon which it has paid the tax imposed by this chapter, or acquires tangible personal property via gift, the sale of such property as well as any other sale defined in sections 63-3612, 67-4711 and 67-4917A, Idaho Code, by the religious corporation or society shall be exempt from the taxes imposed in this chapter, or by any political subdivision of the state. The exemption provided in this section shall be valid as long as the proceeds from the sale are used exclusively in the programs of the corporations or societies as enumerated in section 63-602B, Idaho Code. If at any time, tangible personal property or other items defined in sections 63-3612, 67-4711 and 67-4917A, Idaho Code, are offered for sale to or used by the general public in the open market in regular competition with commercial enterprise, the sale shall be subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter or by any political subdivision of the state.

(2) As used in this section:

“Commercial” relates to or is connected with trade and traffic or commerce in general and is occupied with business or commerce.

“Competition” means the effort of two (2) or more persons, as defined in section 63-3607, Idaho Code, acting independently to secure the business of a third person by the offer of the most favorable terms.

“General public” means the community at large as opposed to select members of the community.

“Market” means a place of commercial activity in which articles are bought and sold.

§ 63-3622LL. Media measurement services exemption. — There is hereby exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale or purchase of any television measurement service, radio measurement service, newspaper measurement service or other media measurement service.

§ 63-3622MM. Livestock sold at livestock markets. — (1) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter, the sale, purchase or use of livestock when sold at a livestock market.

(2) As used in this section, the term “livestock market” shall mean:

A “public livestock market” as defined in section 25-1721, Idaho Code, and holding a charter issued by the Idaho department of agriculture pursuant to chapter 17, title 25, Idaho Code; and

Those organizations expressly exempted from the chartering requirement by section 25-1722, Idaho Code.

(3) As used in this section, the term “livestock” shall mean cattle, calves, sheep, mules, horses, swine or goats.

§ 63-3622NN. Clean rooms. — (1) There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale at retail, storage, use or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property which is exclusively used in or to maintain the environment of, or is or becomes a component part of, a clean room, without regard to whether the property is actually contained within the clean room or whether such tangible personal property ultimately becomes affixed to or incorporated into real property.

(2) The following definitions apply to this section:

“Clean room” means an environment in a defined space, within a larger building, where humidity, temperature, particulate matter and contamination are precisely and regularly controlled; and

Which is a “Class 10,000” clean room or better, and

In which the primary activities are:

Activities which qualify for the production exemption in section 63-3622D, Idaho Code, resulting in the manufacture of products which are either semiconductors, products manufactured using semiconductor manufacturing processes, or equipment used to manufacture semiconductors;

Activities which qualify for the research and development exemption in section 63-3622RR, Idaho Code; or

A combination of the activities described in subparagraphs 1. and 2. above.

“Class 10,000 clean room” means a specified area in which the concentration of airborne particulates of five-tenths (0.5) micrometers or larger is regularly maintained at a level of cleanliness no greater than ten thousand (10,000) particles per cubic foot of air.

“Semiconductor” means a small piece of semiconductor material including silicon:

On which an integrated circuit is embedded, or

Which is altered in the manufacturing process by primarily using semiconductor processes.

“Integrated circuit” means a complex of multiple active electronic components and their interconnections built upon a semiconductor substrate.

“Semiconductor manufacturing processes” means chemical vapor deposition, plasma vapor deposition, wet and dry etch, chemical mechanical planarization or polishing and such other manufacturing processes generally recognized by the semiconductor industry as being standard processes in the industry.

Property is “exclusively used” for a purpose when its use for any other purpose is insignificant or inconsequential.

§ 63-3622OO. Labor for new vehicle accessories. — (1) There is hereby exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter a motor vehicle dealer’s labor or service charge to add accessories to new factory-delivered vehicles, when sold in conjunction with the new vehicle.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

“Accessories” means an object, feature, or device that does not come standard with a motor vehicle to a motor vehicle dealer from a vehicle manufacturer or distributor, but may be ordered by the retail customer as an addition to the motor vehicle to enhance the performance, effectiveness, or beauty of the motor vehicle. Examples include, but are not limited to, saddlebags for a motorcycle, truck bed coating, and storage racks, chemical or film paint sealant, rustproofing, undercoating, stereo or sound systems, anti-theft devices, alarm systems, wheel locks, window tinting, splash guards, or fabric protection for motor vehicles. “Accessories” does not mean a service or maintenance contract.

“Motor vehicle” means a passenger car, moped, motorbike, motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, motorized wheelchair, electric personal assistive mobility device, neighborhood electric vehicle, specialty off-highway vehicle, all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle, all as defined in chapter 1, title 49, Idaho Code, or a vessel, as defined in section 63-3622R(a)(4), Idaho Code, or any other motorized vehicle not described in this paragraph. “Motor vehicle” does not mean aircraft as defined in section 21-101, Idaho Code, a bus, motor home, recreational vehicle, park model recreational vehicle, farm tractor or other self-propelled farm equipment, any type of trailer, special mobile equipment, commercial vehicle or truck exceeding eight thousand (8,000) pounds, or authorized emergency vehicle, all as defined in chapter 1, title 49, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3622PP. Idaho commemorative silver medallions. — There is hereby exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the sale or purchase of Idaho commemorative silver medallions through the office of the treasurer of the state of Idaho or through agents designated by the state treasurer pursuant to the issuance of Idaho commemorative silver medallions authorized in section 67-1223, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3622QQ. Equipment used in alternative method of generation of electricity. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2005, ch. 355, § 2, effective July 1, 2011.

§ 63-3622RR. Research and development. — (1) There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter, the lease, rental, purchase, sale at retail, storage, use or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property which is primarily used in research and development activities.

(2) “Research and development” means an activity which is:

Designed to advance existing knowledge or capability in the field of science or technology, the development of new products, materials, technologies or processes, including new uses for or improvements to existing products, materials, technologies or processes; and

Related to the development, design, manufacture, processing, production or fabrication of:

A product or potential product which is tangible personal property; or

Machinery, materials or components utilized or potentially utilized in the development, design, manufacture, processing, production or fabrication of a product or potential product which is tangible personal property.

§ 63-3622SS. Hunting or shooting sports. — There is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter any fees that may be charged for the use of the facility at shooting ranges or shooting competitions by nonprofit organizations or membership dues charged by nonprofit hunting or shooting sports organizations.

§ 63-3622TT. Custom meat processing. — There is hereby exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter any custom meat processing or packing service, when the consumer furnishes, directly or indirectly, the animal to any seller of meat processing or meat packing services, and any tangible personal property received, however processed, will not be resold.

§ 63-3622UU. Personal property tax on rentals. — The taxes imposed by this chapter do not apply to charges for personal property tax added to the rent paid for leases of tangible personal property. This exemption applies if:

The lessor separately states the charge for property tax to the lessee; and

The amount charged to the lessee is not more than the property tax actually paid by the lessor; and

The lease agreement is for an initial period of one (1) year or longer.

§ 63-3622VV. Idaho information technology equipment. — (1) On and after July 1, 2020, there is exempted from the taxes imposed by this chapter the purchase or use of eligible server equipment and new data center facilities, as defined in this section. The exemption provided in this section shall be available only to qualifying business entities and contractors installing eligible server equipment or building new data center facilities for qualifying business entities. The exemption provided in this section shall not be available for property that has been the subject of business incentives granted to a taxpayer or its affiliates, pursuant to the Idaho reimbursement incentive act, sections 67-4737 through 67-4744, Idaho Code.

(2) As used in this section:

“Business entity” means a separate legal entity or separately operated segment of business that exists for the primary purpose of engaging in a commercial activity for profit and whose sole purpose is the operation of a data center. For the purposes of this section, a separately operated segment of business is a segment of a business for which separate records are maintained and that is operated by an employee or employees whose primary employment responsibility is to operate the business segment.

“Cabling” means a fiber or copper cable used in data centers to connect information sources to a server or storage device.

“Capital investment” means real or tangible personal property that is purchased for use in Idaho and is used by a business entity for the purpose of operating a data center.

“Chiller” means a cooling system used in data centers to remove heat from an element and deposit it into another element.

“Commencement of operations” means the date on which a certificate of occupancy is issued for a data center.

“Data center” means a facility comprised of one (1) or more buildings in Idaho that is used to house eligible server equipment for the transmission and storage of data where the facility has the following characteristics:

Uninterruptible power supplies, generator power, or both;

Sophisticated fire suppression and prevention systems; and

Enhanced physical security and restricted access.

“Eligible server equipment” means new server equipment acquired by a qualifying business entity as described in this subsection that is maintained and operated in a data center located in Idaho for the sole purpose of data transmission and storage services, providing data and transaction processing services, information technology services, or computer collocation services. “Eligible server equipment” includes servers, rack servers, chillers, storage devices, generators, cabling, and enabling software integral to or installed on such equipment.

“Generator” means an engine used in data centers to convert mechanical energy into electricity.

“New data center facilities” means buildings or structural components of buildings, including equipment, materials, and fixtures thereof, that are used in or intended for use primarily as a data center in Idaho.

“New jobs” means new jobs created in Idaho that are nonseasonal, full-time jobs that collectively pay an average weekly wage that equals or exceeds the average weekly wage for the county where the data center is located, as determined by the most recent report of the United States bureau of labor statistics. A job that merely changes locations within the state of Idaho shall not be considered a new job under this section. New jobs must exceed the business entity’s highest number of full-time employees in Idaho during the twenty-four (24) months immediately preceding the commencement of operations of the data center.

“Qualifying business entity” means a business entity that certifies to the state tax commission that it will make capital investments in one (1) or more data centers after July 1, 2020, in amounts of at least two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in the aggregate within the first five (5) years after commencement of construction and that it will create and maintain at least thirty (30) new jobs at the data center within two (2) calendar years after the commencement of operations. Such business entities shall be entitled to a provisional exemption pursuant to this section during the period in which they make capital investments in data center property. If a business entity fails to meet the investment and job creation requirements provided within the time periods required in this section, it shall pay sales or use taxes that would have been due if not for the granting of the provisional exemption. If a business entity meets the investment and job creation requirements provided within the time periods required in this section, its provisional exemption shall become final without further action, and thereafter the exemption shall also apply to all additional purchases of eligible server equipment and purchases associated with constructing new data center facilities.

“Rack server” means a computer in a data center dedicated to use as a server and designed to be installed in a framework called a rack.

“Server” means a computer or computer program used in data centers that manages access to a centralized resource or service in a network.

“Storage device” means a piece of computer equipment on which information can be stored and that is used in data centers.

(3) The state tax commission may promulgate rules to administer and enforce the provisions of this section, including the promulgation of rules relating to the provision of information necessary to certify that the taxpayer satisfies the criteria for a qualifying business entity. For the purpose of carrying out its duties to administer and enforce the provisions of this section, the state tax commission shall have the powers and duties provided by sections 63-217, 63-3038, 63-3039, 63-3042 through 63-3067, 63-3068, 63-3071, and 63-3074 through 63-3078, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3623. Returns and payments.

The taxes imposed by this act are due and payable to the state tax commission monthly on or before the twentieth day of the succeeding month.

All moneys collected or received by the state tax commission from the taxes, penalties, interest and fees imposed by this act shall be deposited with the state treasurer to be credited by him to the sales tax account created by this act.

On or before the twentieth day of the month a return shall be filed with the state tax commission in such form as the state tax commission may prescribe.

For the purpose of the sales tax, a return shall be filed by every seller. For the purposes of the use tax, a return shall be filed by every retailer engaged in business in this state and by every person purchasing tangible personal property, the storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to the use tax, who has not paid the use tax due to a retailer required to collect the tax. Returns shall be signed by the person required to file the return or by his duly authorized agent.

For the purposes of the sales tax, the return shall show the total sales at retail subject to tax under this act during the reporting period. For the purposes of the use tax, in case of a return filed by a retailer, the return shall show the total sales price of the property sold by him, the storage, use, or consumption of which property became subject to the use tax during the reporting period; in the case of a return filed by a purchaser, the return shall show the total sales price of the property purchased by him, the storage, use, or consumption of which became subject to the use tax during the reporting period.

The return shall show the amount of the taxes for the period covered by the return and such other information as the state tax commission deems necessary for the proper administration of this act.

The person required to file the return shall mail or deliver the return together with a remittance of any tax due to the state tax commission for the reporting period.

The state tax commission, if it deems it necessary in order to insure payment to or facilitate the collection by the state of taxes, may require returns for periods other than monthly periods.

For the purposes of the sales tax, gross amounts from rentals or leases of tangible personal property which may be subject to tax under this act shall be reported and the tax paid in accordance with such rules as the state tax commission may prescribe.

The state tax commission for good cause may extend, for not to exceed one (1) month, the time for making any return or paying any amount required to be paid under this act.

Any person to whom an extension is granted and who pays the tax within the period for which the extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the tax, interest at the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, from the date on which the tax would have been due without the extension until the day of payment.

Upon the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle subject to sales or use tax, a certificate of title will be issued to the new owner only upon presentation of evidence of payment of sales or use tax on the transaction.

The owner of a motor vehicle or trailer required to be registered by the laws of this state shall, upon demand, furnish to the officer issuing such registration, satisfactory evidence that any sales or use tax to which such motor vehicle or trailer is subject has been paid to this state before any such registration shall be issued.
(n) Retail sales of tangible personal property through a vending machine which are taxable upon the purchase price paid by the owner or operator of the vending machine pursuant to subsection (e) of section 63-3613, Idaho Code, shall be reported upon the sales tax return of the owner or operator of the vending machine in the manner by which the tax commission may by rule prescribe.

§ 63-3623A. Taxes as state money.

All moneys collected by retailers in compliance with this chapter shall, immediately upon collection, be state money and every such retailer shall hold such money for the state of Idaho and for payment to the state tax commission in the manner and at the times required in this chapter. Such money shall not, for any purpose, be considered to be a part of the proceeds of the sale to which the tax relates and shall not be subject to an encumbrance, security interest, execution or seizure on account of any debt owed by the retailer to any creditor other than the state tax commission.

§ 63-3623B. Amusement devices.

For purposes of this section the term “amusement device” shall mean all coin, currency, or token operated machines and devices which are used for amusement including, but not limited to, game machines, pool tables, juke boxes, electronic games and similar devices.

In lieu of the imposition of sales tax upon the use of the amusement device, the owner or lessee or person having the right to impose a charge for use of the amusement device must pay an annual permit fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for each such device.

Upon payment of the permit fees, the state tax commission shall issue the permit(s) to the owner or lessee or person having the right to impose a charge for use of the amusement device. Such permit fee may be increased in a proportionate amount by the commission if the state sales tax rate increases.

All applications for a permit renewal must be made to the state tax commission on or before July 1 of each year. Such application shall contain the same information required on an application to secure a seller’s permit under this chapter and shall be accompanied by the annual permit fee due for each device.

The state tax commission shall adopt a uniform system of providing, affixing and displaying official decals, labels or other official indicia evidencing that the owner, lessee, or person having the right to impose a charge for the use of the amusement device has paid the annual permit fee for such amusement device. No person subject to a permit fee under this chapter may impose a charge or collect any consideration for use of such amusement device unless such official decal, label, or other official indicia, as required herein, is affixed to such amusement device.

In addition to the penalties set forth above and in section 63-3634, Idaho Code, the state tax commission may assess the following penalties:

If any owner, lessee, or person having the right to impose a charge for the use of any coin, currency or token operated amusement device in this state shall violate any provision of this section or any rule promulgated under this section, the commission may assess penalties, of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each device for failure to pay timely permit sticker fees.

A person who knowingly secures or attempts to secure an amusement device permit sticker under this section by fraud, misrepresentation, or subterfuge or uses any permit issued under this section in a fraudulent manner shall be subject to a penalty of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

The state tax commission shall impose the penalties provided in this section by a notice of deficiency determination in the manner provided in section 63-3629, Idaho Code, which shall be subject to review as provided in section 63-3631, Idaho Code.

The commission may revoke all permits of any person who operates any amusement device without complying with the provisions of this section. Notice of revocation shall be given in the manner provided for deficiencies in taxes in section 63-3629, Idaho Code, which shall be subject to review as provided in section 63-3631, Idaho Code.

Permits issued under this section are transferable to another person only after written notice of the transfer is given to the state tax commission. History.

§ 63-3624. Administration.

The state tax commission shall enforce the provisions of this act and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules relating to the administration and enforcement of this act. The state tax commission may prescribe the extent to which any rule shall be applied without retroactive effect.

The state tax commission shall employ qualified auditors for examination of taxpayers’ records and books. The state tax commission shall also employ such accountants, investigators, regional supervisors, assistants, clerks, and other personnel as are necessary for the efficient administration of this act, and may delegate authority to its representatives to conduct hearings, or perform any other duties imposed by this act.

Every seller, every retailer, and every person storing, using, or otherwise consuming in this state tangible personal property purchased from a retailer shall keep such records, receipts, invoices and other pertinent papers as the state tax commission may require. Every such seller, retailer or person who files the returns required under this act shall keep such records for not less than four (4) years from the making of such records unless the state tax commission in writing sooner authorizes their destruction.

Retail food stores may petition to the state tax commission to be relieved from the responsibility of retaining detailed invoices of nontaxed sales for which the documentation required in sections 63-3620, 63-3621, or 63-3622, Idaho Code, and any other documentation which may be required by the tax commission, has been obtained by the store from the purchaser. The tax commission shall review each petition and may examine the books and records of the petitioner to insure that the products sold by the petitioner are those sold by a retail food store. The tax commission shall give written notice of its determination to the petitioner as soon as practicable after receiving the written request, but in no event later than sixty (60) days after receiving the petition. As used in this section, “retail food stores” shall mean those retail stores primarily engaged in selling food for home preparation and consumption described in major group 54 of the standard industrial classification manual (SIC) of 1987, as amended, published by the office of management and budget of the executive office of the president of the United States.

The state tax commission, or any person authorized in writing by it, may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any person selling tangible personal property and any person liable for the use tax and may investigate the character of the business of the person in order to verify the accuracy of any return made, or, if no return is made by the person, to ascertain and determine the amount required to be paid.

Purchasers claiming exemption from tax and retailers whose pertinent records are kept outside of the state must bring the records to Idaho for examination by the state tax commission upon request of the latter, or, by agreement with the state tax commission, permit an auditor designated by the state tax commission to visit the place where the records are kept, and there audit such records.

In the administration of the use tax, the state tax commission may require the filing of reports by any person or class of persons having in his or their possession or custody information relating to sales of tangible personal property the storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to the tax. The reports shall be filed when the state tax commission requires and shall set forth the names and addresses of purchasers of tangible personal property, the sale price of the property, the date of sale, and such other information as the state tax commission may require.

When the tax commission determines that a retail sale is not exempt and the purchaser has failed to voluntarily pay sales or use tax in regard to the property or services purchased, the tax commission may collect the sales tax which was due at the time of the sale or the use tax due at the time of storage, use or other consumption of the taxable goods or services by issuing to the purchaser a notice of deficiency determination, asserting tax together with interest, at the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, and may assert penalties found elsewhere in this chapter.

If the tax commission determines that the purchaser has repeatedly or intentionally made purchases claimed to be exempt that are not exempt, and the purchaser has failed to voluntarily report and pay use tax in regard to those purchases, or the commission determines that the purchaser has repeatedly or intentionally made purchases claimed to be exempt that are not exempt and has removed the goods from this state, the commission may assert a penalty equal to five percent (5%) of the sales price of the property or two hundred dollars ($200), whichever is greater. The tax commission may abate the penalty when the purchaser establishes during a proceeding for redetermination that there were reasonable grounds for believing that the purchase was properly exempt from tax.

§ 63-3625. Security for tax.

The state tax commission, whenever it deems it necessary to insure compliance with this act, may require any person subject to this act to place with it such security as it may determine. The amount of the necessary security shall be fixed by the state tax commission but, except as provided hereafter, shall not be greater than three (3) times the estimated average monthly amount payable by such persons pursuant to this act or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever amount is the lesser. In the case of persons habitually delinquent in their obligations under this act, the amount of the security shall not be greater than five (5) times the estimated average monthly amount payable by such persons pursuant to this act or ten thousand dollars ($10,000), whichever is the lesser. The amount of the security may be increased or decreased by the state tax commission at any time, subject to the limitations above set forth.

The state tax commission may sell the security at public auction or, in the case of security in the form of bearer bonds issued by the United States or the state of Idaho which have a prevailing market price, at a private sale at a price not lower than the prevailing market price if it becomes necessary to make such sale in order to recover any tax, interest or penalties due on any amount required to be collected. Notice of the sale must be given to the person who deposited the security at least ten (10) days before the sale; such notice may be given personally or by mail addressed to the person at the address furnished to the state tax commission and as it appears in the records of the state tax commission. Upon such sale, any surplus above the amounts due shall be returned to the person who placed the security.

§ 63-3626. Refunds, limitations, interest.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, if any amount due under this chapter has been overpaid, the excess amount may be credited on any amount then due to the state tax commission from the person by whom the excess was paid and any balance refunded to that person.

No such credit or refund shall be allowed after three (3) years from the time the payment was made to the state tax commission, unless before the expiration of such period a written claim therefor is filed with the state tax commission by the claimant or the claimant’s representative, but only if the claimant has authorized in writing the representative to file a claim.
(b)(1) No such credit or refund shall be allowed after three (3) years from the time the payment was made to the state tax commission, unless before the expiration of such period a written claim therefor is filed with the state tax commission by the claimant or the claimant’s representative, but only if the claimant has authorized in writing the representative to file a claim.

For periods in regard to which the state tax commission asserts a deficiency under section 63-3629 or 63-3630, Idaho Code, a claim for refund, relating to the period to which the deficiency relates, must be made on or before the later of:

The date provided in subsection (b)(1) of this section; or

The date upon which any administrative or judicial proceeding relating to such deficiency is finally resolved; or

The date specified in any agreement under section 63-3633(g), Idaho Code.

A taxpayer claiming a refund of amounts paid in obedience to such deficiencies must do so by appealing within the time limits prescribed in sections 63-3631 and 63-3049, Idaho Code.

Interest shall be allowed on the amount of such credits or refunds at the rate provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, from the date such tax was paid to the state tax commission.

If the state tax commission denies a claim for refund in whole or in part, it shall provide notice of the denial in the manner provided in section 63-3629(c), Idaho Code. The claimant may petition the state tax commission for a redetermination of the denial as provided in section 63-3631, Idaho Code. The state tax commission shall issue a final decision pursuant to the requirements of section 63-3045B, Idaho Code. Appeal of a tax commission decision denying in whole or in part a claim for refund shall be made in accordance with and within the time limits prescribed in section 63-3049, Idaho Code.